California, session 20252026, SB907.
do enact as follows:SECTION 1. Section 20001 of the Vehicle Code is amended to read:20001. (a) The driver of a vehicle involved in an accident resulting in injury to a person, other than themselves, or in the death of a person shall immediately stop the vehicle at the scene of the accident and shall fulfill the requirements of Sections 20003 and 20004.(b) (1) (A) Except as provided in subparagraph (B) and in paragraph (2), a person who violates subdivision (a) shall be punished by imprisonment in the state prison, or in a county jail for not more than one year, or by a fine of not less than one thousand dollars ($1,000) nor more than ten thousand dollars ($10,000), or by both that imprisonment and fine.(B) A person who violates subdivision (a) within 10 years of a separate violation of Section 23103, as specified in Section 23103.5, 23152, or 23153, or a violation of Section 191.5 of the Penal Code, or paragraph (1) of subdivision (c) of Section 192 of the Penal Code, that resulted in a conviction, shall be punished by imprisonment in the state prison for two, three, or four years. years, or in a county jail for not more than one year, or by a fine of not less than one thousand dollars ($1,000) nor more than ten thousand dollars ($10,000), or by both that imprisonment and fine.(2) (A) If the accident described in subdivision (a) results in death or permanent, serious injury, a person who violates subdivision (a) shall be punished by imprisonment in the state prison for two, three, or four years, or in a county jail for not less than 90 days nor more than one year, or by a fine of not less than one thousand dollars ($1,000) nor more than ten thousand dollars ($10,000), or by both that imprisonment and fine. However, the court, in the interests of justice and for reasons stated in the record, may reduce or eliminate the minimum imprisonment required by this paragraph.(B) If the accident described in subdivision (a) results in death or permanent, serious injury, and the violation of subdivision (a) occurred within 10 years of a separate violation of Section 23103, as specified in Section 23103.5, 23152, or 23153, or a violation of Section 191.5 of the Penal Code, or paragraph (1) of subdivision (c) of Section 192 of the Penal Code, that resulted in a conviction, a person who violates subdivision (a) shall be punished by imprisonment in the state prison for two, four, or six years. three, four, or five years, or in a county jail for not less than 90 days nor more than one year, and by a fine of not less than one thousand dollars ($1,000) nor more than ten thousand dollars ($10,000). However, the court, in the interests of justice and for reasons stated in the record, may reduce or eliminate the minimum imprisonment required by this paragraph.(3) In imposing the minimum fine required by this subdivision, the court shall take into consideration the defendant’s ability to pay the fine and, in the interests of justice and for reasons stated in the record, may reduce the amount of that minimum fine to less than the amount otherwise required by this subdivision.(c) A person who flees the scene of the crime after committing a violation of Section 191.5 of, or paragraph (1) of subdivision (c) of Section 192 of the Penal Code, upon conviction of any of those sections, in addition and consecutive to the punishment prescribed, shall be punished by an additional term of imprisonment of five years in the state prison. This additional term shall not be imposed unless the allegation is charged in the accusatory pleading and admitted by the defendant or found to be true by the trier of fact. The court shall not strike a finding that brings a person within the provisions of this subdivision or an allegation made pursuant to this subdivision.(d) As used in this section, “permanent, serious injury” means the loss or permanent impairment of function of a bodily member or organ.SEC. 2.Section 20002 of the Vehicle Code is amended to read:20002.(a)The driver of any vehicle involved in an accident resulting only in damage to any property, including vehicles, shall immediately stop the vehicle at the nearest location that will not impede traffic or otherwise jeopardize the safety of other motorists. Moving the vehicle in accordance with this subdivision does not affect the question of fault. The driver shall also immediately do either of the following:(1)Locate and notify the owner or person in charge of that property of the name and address of the driver and owner of the vehicle involved and, upon locating the driver of any other vehicle involved or the owner or person in charge of any damaged property, upon being requested, present their driver’s license, and vehicle registration, to the other driver, property owner, or person in charge of that property. The information presented shall include the current residence address of the driver and of the registered owner. If the registered owner of an involved vehicle is present at the scene, they shall also, upon request, present their driver’s license information, if available, or other valid identification to the other involved parties.(2)Leave in a conspicuous place on the vehicle or other property damaged a written notice giving the name and address of the driver and of the owner of the vehicle involved and a statement of the circumstances thereof and shall without unnecessary delay notify the police department of the city wherein the collision occurred or, if the collision occurred in unincorporated territory, the local headquarters of the Department of the California Highway Patrol.(b)Any person who parks a vehicle which, prior to the vehicle again being driven, becomes a runaway vehicle and is involved in an accident resulting in damage to any property, attended or unattended, shall comply with the requirements of this section relating to notification and reporting and shall, upon conviction thereof, be liable to the penalties of this section for failure to comply with the requirements.(c)(1)Any person failing to comply with all the requirements of this section is guilty of a misdemeanor and, upon conviction thereof, shall be punished by imprisonment in the county jail not exceeding six months, or by a fine not exceeding one thousand dollars ($1,000), or by both that imprisonment and fine.(2)A violation of this section occurring within 10 years of a separate violation of Section 23103, as specified in Section 23103.5, 23152, or 23153, or a violation of Section 191.5 of, or paragraph (1) of subdivision (c) of Section 192 of, the Penal Code, that resulted in a conviction, shall be punished by imprisonment in the state prison, or in a county jail for not more than one year.SEC. 3.Section 23583 is added to the Vehicle Code, to read:23583.(a)For a person convicted of an offense enumerated in subdivision (b) for which a prison sentence or a sentence of imprisonment pursuant to subdivision (h) of Section 1170 of the Penal Code is imposed and is not suspended, the court shall impose, in addition and consecutive to any other sentence, a 3-year term for each prior separate conviction of an offense enumerated in subdivision (b), except that an additional term shall not be imposed under this subdivision for any prior conviction suffered prior to a period of 10 years in which the defendant remained free of both the commission of an offense that results in a felony conviction, and prison custody or the imposition of a term of jail custody imposed under subdivision (h) of Section 1170 of the Penal Code or any felony sentence that is not suspended.(b)This section applies to all of the following:(1)A felony violation of Section 23152 or 23153.(2)An offense punishable pursuant to Section 23550 or 23550.5.(3)A violation of Section 191.5 of the Penal Code.SEC. 4.SEC. 2. Section 23635 of the Vehicle Code is amended to read:23635. (a) This section shall be known, and may be cited, as Braun’s Law.(b) When an allegation of a violation of Section 23152 is dismissed by the court, an allegation of a different or lesser offense is substituted for an allegation of a violation of Section 23152, or an allegation of a separate conviction is dismissed or stricken, the court shall specify on the record its reason or reasons for the order. The court shall also specify on the record whether the dismissal, substitution, or striking was requested by the prosecution and whether the prosecution concurred in or opposed the dismissal, substitution, or striking.(c) When the prosecution makes a motion for a dismissal or substitution, or for the striking of a separate conviction, the prosecution shall submit a written statement which shall become part of the court record and which gives the reasons for the motion. The reasons shall include, but need not be limited to, problems of proof, the interests of justice, why another offense is more properly charged, if applicable, and any other pertinent reasons. If the reasons include the “interests of justice,” the written statement shall specify all of the factors which contributed to this conclusion.(d) If the court dismisses an allegation of a violation of Section 23152, or a defendant pleads guilty or no contest to a different or lesser offense as a substitute for an alleged violation of Section 23152, the court shall give an advisement pursuant to Section 23593.SEC. 5.SEC. 3. No reimbursement is required by this act pursuant to Section 6 of Article XIII B of the California Constitution because the only costs that may be incurred by a local agency or school district will be incurred because this act creates a new crime or infraction, eliminates a crime or infraction, or changes the penalty for a crime or infraction, within the meaning of Section 17556 of the Government Code, or changes the definition of a crime within the meaning of Section 6 of Article XIII B of the California Constitution.